Washington statutes.
RCW 7.54.020

Service—Notice by posting.

(1) This chapter does not limit or affect the method by which service of a complaint in a partition action may be made.

(2) If the plaintiff in a partition action seeks an order of notice by publication and the court determines that the property may be heirs property, the plaintiff, not later than 10 days after the court's determination, shall post and maintain while the action is pending a conspicuous sign on the property that is the subject of the action. The sign must state that the action has commenced and identify the name and address of the court and the common designation by which the property is known. The court may require the plaintiff to publish on the sign the name of the plaintiff and the known defendants.

[ 2023 c 6 s 104.]